Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.040

Advertising—Use of title.

(1)(a) It shall be unlawful to advertise the practice of massage using the term massage or any other term that implies a massage technique or method in any public or private publication or communication by a person not licensed by the secretary as a massage therapist. However, this subsection does not prohibit a certified reflexologist from using the term reflexology or derivations of the term, subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(b) Any person who holds a license to practice as a massage therapist in this state may use the title "licensed massage therapist" and the abbreviation "L.M.T." No other persons may assume such title or use such abbreviation or any other word, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person using the title is a licensed massage therapist.

(c) A massage therapist's name and license number must conspicuously appear on all of the massage therapist's advertisements.

(2)(a) It is unlawful to advertise the practice of reflexology or use any other term that implies reflexology technique or method in any public or private publication or communication by a person not certified by the secretary as a reflexologist or licensed as a massage therapist.

(b) A person certified as a reflexologist may not adopt or use any title or description of services, including for purposes of advertising, that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Massage, masseuse, massager, massagist, masseur, myotherapist or myotherapy, touch therapist, body therapy or therapist, or any derivation of those terms that implies a massage technique or therapy unless the person is also licensed under this chapter as a massage therapist.

(c) A reflexologist's name and certification number must conspicuously appear on all of the reflexologist's advertisements.

[ 2016 c 41 s 4; 2012 c 137 s 6; 2011 c 223 s 1; 1995 c 353 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 255; 1987 c 443 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.